src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-vuozi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - vuozi: # nouns '(eng) year / (fin) vuosi' 
    vuozi+N+Sg+Nom: vuozi
    vuozi+N+Sg+Gen: vuvven
#    vuozi+N+Sg+Ill: vuodeh
    vuozi+N+Sg+Ine: vuvves
    vuozi+N+Sg+Ela: [vuvves, vuvvespäi]
    vuozi+N+Sg+Ade: vuvvel
    vuozi+N+Sg+Abl: [vuvvel, vuvvelpäi]
    vuozi+N+Sg+Par: vuottu
#    vuozi+N+Sg+Q: vuodessah

    vuozi+N+Pl+Nom: vuvvet
